old/apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix.xml
<!-- possessive pronouns: only when the last letter is (ه) and sounds (e) -other used form -->
    <pardef n="S__pos__vowels">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ام</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ات</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اش</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یمان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یتان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یشان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      </pardef>
<!-- possessive pronouns: end -->

    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="دشمن__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ها), entry with ZWNJ -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ها), entry without ZWNJ -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ان) -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ان</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="آزادی__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ها), entry with ZWNJ -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ها), entry without ZWNJ -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="پیشوا__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ها), entry with ZWNJ -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ها), entry without ZWNJ -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ان) -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>یان</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="پرند/ه__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ه</l>
          <r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ای"/>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ها), entry with ZWNJ -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ه‌ها</l>
          <r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ها), entry without ZWNJ -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>هها</l>
          <r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ان), entry with ZWNJ -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ه‌گان</l>
          <r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ان), entry without ZWNJ -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>گان</l>
          <r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="اجسام__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="بابک__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="هنوز__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="بزرگ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌تر</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ترین</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- entradas without ZWNJ analyse only -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>تر</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ترین</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l><b/>تر</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l><b/>ترین</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="اوه__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="دید__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>م</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ی</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یم</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ید</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ند</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="بین__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>م</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ی</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>د</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یم</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ید</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ند</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imprt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ید</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imprt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="آمریکایی"><i>آمریکایی</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پارسی"><i>پارسی</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
    <e lm="زن"><i>زن</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کارگردان"><i>کارگردان</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ملوان"><i>ملوان</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بستان"><i>بستان</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جانی"><i>جانی</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="رکن"><i>رکن</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="عکاسی"><i>عکاسی</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="متان"><i>متان</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="وبلاگ"><i>وبلاگ</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مبتلا"><i>مبتلا</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نانوا"><i>نانوا</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بینا"><i>بینا</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پیشوا"><i>پیشوا</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کارفرما"><i>کارفرما</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دانشجو"><i>دانشجو</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مددجو"><i>مددجو</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بنیانگذار"><i>بنیانگذار</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شهردار"><i>شهردار</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گوهر"><i>گوهر</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="امامزاده"><i>امامزاد</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بازنده"><i>بازند</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بنده"><i>بند</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="حشره"><i>حشر</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="رفته"><i>رفت</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="فرستاده"><i>فرستاد</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نوازنده"><i>نوازند</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اساطیر"><i>اساطیر</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="امتیازاتی"><i>امتیازاتی</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تزیینات"><i>تزیینات</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="حواس"><i>حواس</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شرکای"><i>شرکای</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کارایان"><i>کارایان</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نفوس"><i>نفوس</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="المنار"><i>المنار</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="تالش"><i>تالش</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="رجوی"><i>رجوی</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="شوروی"><i>شوروی</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="کانادا"><i>کانادا</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="میرحسین"><i>میرحسین</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ویکتور"><i>ویکتور</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="نگریست"><i>نگریست</i><par n="دید__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="نگر"><i>نگر</i><par n="بین__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="داد"><i>داد</i><par n="دید__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ده"><i>ده</i><par n="بین__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افکند"><i>افکند</i><par n="دید__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افکن"><i>افکن</i><par n="بین__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="برگرداند"><i>برگرداند</i><par n="دید__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="برگردان"><i>برگردان</i><par n="بین__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="پوشید"><i>پوشید</i><par n="دید__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="پوش"><i>پوش</i><par n="بین__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="فرمود"><i>فرمود</i><par n="دید__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="فرمای"><i>فرما</i><par n="بین__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اینچنین"><i>اینچنین</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بدرود"><i>بدرود</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بنابراین"><i>بنابراین</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="حکیمانه"><i>حکیمانه</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="درمعرض"><i>درمعرض</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="عاقلانه"><i>عاقلانه</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="نهایتا"><i>نهایتا</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بحق"><i>بحق</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="جویا"><i>جویا</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="روشن"><i>روشن</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="عربی"><i>عربی</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="گرمسیری"><i>گرمسیری</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="مستحکم"><i>مستحکم</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="احسنتم"><i>احسنتم</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="انشاءالله"><i>انشاءالله</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="اوی"><i>اوی</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="بارک‌الله"><i>بارک‌الله</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="بـه"><i>بـه</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="زهی"><i>زهی</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
